Tennessee, session 114, HB1718.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 41, Chapter 24, is amended by adding
the following new section:
(a) The department shall study the cost of equipping correctional officers and
employees of prison contractors with body cameras who work in an adult correctional
facility located:
(1) On public property that houses, in whole or in part, inmates under the
custody of the department for which correction services are provided to such
inmates by a prison contractor; and
(2) In a county that has a metropolitan form of government with a
population of not less than eleven thousand six hundred (11,600) and not more
than eleven thousand six hundred sixteen (11,616), according to the 2020 federal
census or a subsequent federal census.
(b) The department shall report its findings to the chair of the senate state and
local government committee and the chair of the committee of the house of
representatives with jurisdiction over corrections not later than July 1, 2026. The report
may be submitted electronically.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1718
010985
- 1 -